test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Num-kuin_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.

  Num -куинь: # Noun куинь 'eng /udm /fin' - full paradigm
    куинь+Num+Card+Abs:куинь
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom:куинь
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Acc:куинез
#    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Acc+Dial/North:куиньты
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen:куиньлэн
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl:куиньлэсь
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat:куиньлы
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ins:куинен
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe:куиньтэк
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Advl:куинья
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine:куиньын
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill:куине
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela:куиньысь
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Egr:куиньысен
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter:куинёзь
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl:куинетӥ
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr:куиньлань

    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom:куиньёс
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Acc: [куиньёсыз, куиньёсты]
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen:куиньёслэн
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl:куиньёслэсь
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat:куиньёслы
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ins:куиньёсын
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe:куиньёстэк
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Advl:куиньёсъя
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine:куиньёсын
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill:куиньёсы
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela:куиньёсысь
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Egr:куиньёсысен
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter:куиньёсозь
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl:куиньёстӥ
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr:куиньёслань

     # possessive, and Cx-Px / Px-Cx

    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:куине
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2:куинед
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:куинез
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1:куиньмы
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2:куиньды
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3:куиньзы

    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1:куиньёсы
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2:куиньёсыд
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3:куиньёсыз
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1:куиньёсмы
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2:куиньёсты
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3:куиньёссы

    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1:куиньме
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2:куиньтэ
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3:куиньсэ
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1:куиньмес
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2:куиньдэс
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3:куиньзэс

    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1:куиньёсме
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2:куиньёстэ
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3:куиньёссэ
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1:куиньёсмес
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2:куиньёстэс
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3:куиньёссэс

    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1:куинелэн
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2:куинедлэн
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3:куинезлэн
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1:куиньмылэн
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2:куиньдылэн
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3:куиньзылэн

    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1:куиньёсылэн
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2:куиньёсыдлэн
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3:куиньёсызлэн
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1:куиньёсмылэн
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2:куиньёстылэн
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3:куиньёссылэн

    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1:куинелэсь
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2:куинедлэсь
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3:куинезлэсь
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1:куиньмылэсь
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2:куиньдылэсь
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3:куиньзылэсь

    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1:куиньёсылэсь
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2:куиньёсыдлэсь
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3:куиньёсызлэсь
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1:куиньёсмылэсь
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2:куиньёстылэсь
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3:куиньёссылэсь

    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1:куинелы
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2:куинедлы
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3:куинезлы
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1:куиньмылы
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2:куиньдылы
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3:куиньзылы

    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1:куиньёсылы
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2:куиньёсыдлы
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3:куиньёсызлы
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1:куиньёсмылы
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2:куиньёстылы
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3:куиньёссылы

    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg1:куиненым
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg2:куиненыд
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg3:куиненыз
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl1:куиненымы
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl2:куиненыды
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl3:куиненызы

    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg1:куиньёсыным
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg2:куиньёсыныд
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg3:куиньёсыныз
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl1:куиньёсынымы
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl2:куиньёсыныды
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl3:куиньёсынызы

    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1:куинетэк
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg2:куинедтэк
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg3:куинезтэк
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl1:куиньмытэк
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl2:куиньдытэк
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl3:куиньзытэк

    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1:куиньёсытэк
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg2:куиньёсыдтэк
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg3:куиньёсызтэк
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl1:куиньёсмытэк
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl2:куиньёстытэк
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl3:куиньёссытэк

    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Advl+PxSg1:куинея
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Advl+PxSg2:куинедъя
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Advl+PxSg3:куинезъя
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Advl+PxPl1:куиньмыя
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Advl+PxPl2:куиньдыя
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Advl+PxPl3:куиньзыя

    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Advl+PxSg1:куиньёсыя
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Advl+PxSg2:куиньёсыдъя
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Advl+PxSg3:куиньёсызъя
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Advl+PxPl1:куиньёсмыя
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Advl+PxPl2:куиньёстыя
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Advl+PxPl3:куиньёссыя

    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg1:куиням
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg2:куиняд
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg3:куиняз
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl1:куинямы
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl2:куиняды
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl3:куинязы

    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg1:куиньёсам
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg2:куиньёсад
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg3:куиньёсаз
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl1:куиньёсамы
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl2:куиньёсады
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl3:куиньёсазы

    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1:куиням
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2:куиняд
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3:куиняз
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1:куинямы
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2:куиняды
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3:куинязы

    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1:куиньёсам
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2:куиньёсад
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3:куиньёсаз
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1:куиньёсамы
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2:куиньёсады
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3:куиньёсазы

    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1:куиньысьтым
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg2:куиньысьтыд
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg3:куиньысьтыз
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl1:куиньысьтымы
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl2:куиньысьтыды
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl3:куиньысьтызы

    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg1:куиньёсысьтым
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg2:куиньёсысьтыд
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg3:куиньёсысьтыз
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl1:куиньёсысьтымы
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl2:куиньёсысьтыды
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl3:куиньёсысьтызы

    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1:куиньысеным
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg2:куиньысеныд
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg3:куиньысеныз
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl1:куиньысенымы
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl2:куиньысеныды
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl3:куиньысенызы

    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg1:куиньёсысеным
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg2:куиньёсысеныд
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg3:куиньёсысеныз
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl1:куиньёсысенымы
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl2:куиньёсысеныды
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl3:куиньёсысенызы

    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg1:куинёзям
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg2:куинёзяд
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg3:куинёзяз
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl1: [куинёзямы,куиньмыозь]
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl2: [куинёзяды,куиньтыозь]
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl3: [куинёзязы,куиньсыозь]

    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg1:куиньёсозям
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg2:куиньёсозяд
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg3:куиньёсозяз
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl1:куиньёсмыозь
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl2:куиньёстыозь
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl3:куиньёссыозь

    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg1:куинетӥм
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg2:куинетӥд
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg3:куинетӥз
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl1:куинетӥмы
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl2:куинетӥды
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl3:куинетӥзы

    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg1:куиньёстӥм
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg2:куиньёстӥд
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg3:куиньёстӥз
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl1:куиньёстӥмы
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl2:куиньёстӥды
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl3:куиньёстӥзы

    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg1:куинелань
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg2:куинедлань
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg3:куинезлань
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl1:куиньмылань
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl2:куиньдылань
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl3:куиньзылань

    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg1:куиньёсылань
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg2:куиньёсыдлань
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg3:куиньёсызлань
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl1:куиньёсмылань
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl2:куиньёстылань
    куинь+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl3:куиньёссылань


## Ordinals
